Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3.5. Cathode Ray Tubes and Mercury Thermostats Recycling.

§ 10.1-1425.26.
Cathode ray tube and mercury thermostat special waste recycling program.

As used in this section “cathode ray tube” means an intact glass tube used to provide the visual display in televisions, computer monitors, oscilloscopes and similar scientific equipment, but does not include the other components of an electronic product containing a cathode ray tube even if the product and the cathode ray tube are disassembled.

The Board shall promulgate regulations to encourage the recycling of thermostats containing mercury, cathode ray tubes, and electronics products.

Any locality may, by ordinance, prohibit the disposal of thermostats containing mercury and cathode ray tubes in any waste-to-energy or solid waste disposal facility within its jurisdiction, provided the locality has implemented a recycling program that is capable of handling all thermostats containing mercury and cathode ray tubes generated within its jurisdiction. However, no such ordinance shall contain any provision that penalizes anyone other than the initial generator of such thermostats containing mercury and cathode ray tubes.

History.

2003, c. 743; 2008, c. 12; 2010, c. 4.

Effective date.

This article is effective July 1, 2003.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 12 substituted “any waste-to-energy or solid waste disposal facility within” for “any privately operated landfill within” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 4, inserted “and Mercury Thermostats” in the Article 3.5 heading; substituted “the recycling of thermostats containing mercury cathode ray tubes, and electronics products” for “cathode ray tube and electronics recycling,” in subsection B; and in subsection C, inserted “thermostats containing mercury and” three times.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).